hw_3_foma/span.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Inf +1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

pedir   Suff;
medir   Suff;
renir   Suff;

LEXICON Suff

+Inf:^ir       #;
+1Sg:^o        #;
+2Sg:^es       #;
+3Sg:^e        #;
+1Pl:^imos     #;
+2Pl:^is       #;
+3Pl:^en       #;
